tr: Radyo tarayıcı form faktörü: Sabit; Paket; Masaüstü; Elde taşınan; Kit; Mobil (araç montajlı); Ağ alıcısı; Taşınabilir sırt çantası; Kiralık ünite; USB SDR dongle; Diğer
ro-RO: Factor de formă scanner radio: Bază; Pachet; Desktop; De mână; Kit; Mobil (montat pe vehicul); Receptor de rețea; Rucsac portabil; Unitate de închiriat; Dongle USB SDR; Altele
sv: Radioskanners formfaktor: Bas; Paket; Desktop; Handhållen; Kit; Mobil (fordonsmonterad); Nätverksmottagare; Bärbar ryggsäck; Hyresenhet; USB SDR-dongel; Övrigt
es: Factor de forma del escáner de radio: Base; Paquete; Escritorio; Portátil; Kit; Móvil (montado en vehículo); Receptor de red; Mochila portátil; Unidad de alquiler; Adaptador USB SDR; Otros
vi: Kiểu dáng máy quét radio: Cố định; Bộ sản phẩm; Để bàn; Cầm tay; Bộ dụng cụ; Di động (gắn xe); Bộ thu mạng; Ba lô xách tay; Thiết bị cho thuê; USB SDR dongle; Khác
ja: ラジオスキャナーフォームファクター: ベース; バンドル; デスクトップ; ハンドヘルド; キット; モバイル（車載）; ネットワークレシーバー; ポータブルバックパック; レンタルユニット; USB SDRドングル; その他
hu: Rádiószkenner-formátum: Bázis; Csomag; Asztali; Kézi; Készlet; Mobil (járműbe szerelt); Hálózati vevő; Hordozható hátizsák; Bérleti egység; USB SDR dongle; Egyéb
da: Radioscanner-formfaktor: Base; Bundt; Desktop; Håndholdt; Sæt; Mobil (køretøjsmonteret); Netværksmodtager; Bærbar rygsæk; Lejeenhed; USB SDR-dongle; Andet
de: Funkscanner-Formfaktor: Basis; Paket; Desktop; Handgerät; Kit; Mobil (fahrzeugmontiert); Netzwerkempfänger; Tragbarer Rucksack; Mietgerät; USB-SDR-Dongle; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 无线电扫描仪外形: 基站型; 套装; 桌面式; 手持式; 套件; 移动式 (车载); 网络接收器; 便携式背包; 租赁单元; USB SDR 加密狗; 其他
nl: Radio scanner vormfactor: Basis; Bundel; Op bureau; Handbediend; Kit; Mobiel (voertuiggemonteerd); Netwerkontvanger; Draagbare rugzak; Huureenheid; USB SDR dongle; Andere
cs: Provedení rádiového skeneru: Základnový; Balíček; Stolní; Ruční; Sada; Mobilní (do vozidla); Síťový přijímač; Přenosný batoh; Pronajímatelná jednotka; USB SDR dongle; Jiné
th: รูปแบบของสแกนเนอร์วิทยุ: ฐาน; ชุดรวม; สำหรับตั้งโต๊ะ; แบบมือถือ; ชุดอุปกรณ์; มือถือ (ติดยานพาหนะ); ตัวรับสัญญาณเครือข่าย; กระเป๋าเป้พกพา; ตัวเครื่องเช่า; ดองเกิล USB SDR; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Radijo skaitytuvo formos faktorius: Bazinis; Rinkinys; Stalinis; Rankinis; Rinkinys; Mobilusis (montuojamas transporto priemonėje); Tinklo imtuvas; Nešiojama kuprinė; Nuomos įrenginys; USB SDR adapteris; Kita
ru: Формфактор радиосканера: Базовый; Комплект; ПК; Вручную; Комплект; Мобильный (автомобильный); Сетевой приемник; Переносной рюкзачный; Арендуемый блок; USB SDR-адаптер; Другой
fr: Facteur de forme du scanner radio: Base; Ensemble; Bureau; Portatif; Kit; Mobile (montage véhicule); Récepteur réseau; Sac à dos portable; Unité de location; Dongle USB SDR; Autre
ko: 무선 스캐너 폼 팩터: 베이스; 번들; 데스크탑; 휴대용; 키트; 모바일 (차량 장착); 네트워크 리시버; 휴대용 백팩; 렌탈 유닛; USB SDR 동글; 기타
fi: Radioskannerin muototekijä: Tukiasema; Paketti; Työpöytä; Kädessä pidettävä; Sarja; Ajoneuvoasenteinen; Verkkovastaanotin; Kannettava reppu; Vuokrayksikkö; USB SDR -sovitin; Muu
sl-SI: Oblika radijskega skenerja: Bazna; Paket; Namizna; Ročna; Komplet; Mobilni (nameščen v vozilo); Omrežni sprejemnik; Prenosni nahrbtnik; Najemna enota; Ključek USB SDR; Drugo
it: Fattore di forma dello scanner radio: Base; Bundle; Desktop; A mano; Kit; Mobile (montaggio su veicolo); Ricevitore di rete; Zaino portatile; Unità a noleggio; Dongle USB SDR; Altro
pt-PT: Formato do scanner de rádio: Base; Pacote; De secretária; Dispositivo portátil; Kit; Móvel (montado em veículo); Recetor de rede; Mochila portátil; Unidade de aluguer; Dongle USB SDR; Outro
pt-BR: Formato do scanner de rádio: Base; Pacote; Desktop; Portátil; Kit; Móvel (montado em veículo); Receptor de rede; Mochila portátil; Unidade de aluguel; Dongle USB SDR; Outro
nb: Radioskanner formfaktor: Base; Pakke; Skrivebord; Håndholdt; Sett; Mobil (kjøretøymontert); Nettverksmottaker; Bærbar ryggsekk; Leieenhet; USB SDR-dongle; Annet
el: Μορφή σαρωτή ραδιοφώνου: Βάση; Πακέτο; Επιτραπέζιο; Χειροκίνητη; Κιτ; Κινητό (τοποθετημένο σε όχημα); Δέκτης δικτύου; Φορητό σακίδιο; Μονάδα ενοικίασης; USB SDR dongle; Άλλο
hr-HR: Oblik radio skenera: Bazni; Paket; Stolno; Ručno; Komplet; Mobilni (ugrađen u vozilo); Mrežni prijemnik; Prijenosni ruksak; Jedinica za najam; USB SDR dongle; Ostalo
bg-BG: Типоразмер на радиоскенера: Базов; Пакет; Настолен; Преносим; Комплект; Мобилен (монтиран на превозно средство); Мрежов приемник; Портативна раница; Устройство под наем; USB SDR донгъл; Други
zh-TW: 無線電掃描器外型規格: 基地式; 套裝; 桌上型; 手持式; 套件; 移動式（車載）; 網路接收器; 便攜背包式; 租賃設備; USB SDR 接收器; 其他
en: Radio scanner form factor: Base; Bundle; Desktop; Handheld; Kit; Mobile (vehicle-mounted); Network receiver; Portable backpack; Rental unit; USB SDR dongle; Other
pl: Format skanera radiowego: Bazowy; Pakiet; Desktop; Mobilny; Zestaw; Mobilny (montowany w pojeździe); Odbiornik sieciowy; Przenośny plecak; Jednostka wypożyczalna; Adapter USB SDR; Inne
sk-SK: Formát rádiového skenera: Základňový; Balík; Osobný počítač; Ručný; Súprava; Mobilný (vozidlový); Sieťový prijímač; Prenosný batoh; Prenajímateľná jednotka; USB SDR adaptér; Iné